Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,173
Beekeeping; inspection certificate; procedure.

(1) The department shall issue certificates stating that an apiary is apparently free from infectious or contagious diseases, parasites, or pests after inspecting the apiary when such apiary is apparently free from such diseases, parasites, and pests and upon payment of the certificate fee provided for in section 81-2,174. Such certificate shall also state the date of inspection and shall continue in force for one year unless revoked for cause.

(2) Any person may request an inspection for his or her apiary in order to obtain a certificate.

Laws 1929, c. 9, § 9, p. 80;

C.S.1929, § 81-2709;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,173;

Laws 1979, LB 548, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 1001, § 8;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 49;

Laws 1994, LB 1071, § 11;

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 26;

Laws 2004, LB 835, § 6.